Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Former Governor

§ 7-1-151.
Appropriation to defray certain expenses of former governor.

A special appropriation to the state fiscal management board is hereby authorized to defray the expenses of providing necessary secretarial assistance and office supplies for a former governor for a reasonable period of time, not to exceed six (6) months from the expiration of said governor’s term of office, to enable such ex-governor to wind up his public obligations and responsibilities and to answer his correspondence and close his official files.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-51; Laws, 1972, ch. 355, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 162, eff from and after July 1, 1984.